Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1713.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "economic development agencies" in section 3 of the act of May 19, 1995 (P.L.33, No.3), known as the Economic Development Agency, Fiduciary and Lender Environmental Liability Protection Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Economic development [agencies."] agency." The term includes:(1) Any redevelopment authority created under the act of 123456789101112131415161718 May 24, 1945 (P.L.991, No.385), known as the Urban Redevelopment Law, and any nonprofit corporation created and controlled by a redevelopment authority to carry out its statutory purpose.(2) Any industrial development agency as that term is defined in the act of May 17, 1956 (1955 P.L.1609, No.537), known as the Pennsylvania Industrial Development Authority Act.(3) Any industrial and commercial development authority created under the act of August 23, 1967 (P.L.251, No.102), known as the Economic Development Financing Law.(4) Any area loan organization as that term is defined in [the act of July 2, 1984 (P.L.545, No.109), known as the Capital Loan Fund Act] section 2301 of the act of June 29, 1996 (P.L.434, No.67), known as the Job Enhancement Act.(5) Any other Commonwealth or municipal authority which acquires title or an interest in property.(6) [Municipalities] Any municipality or municipal industrial development or community development [departments] department organized by ordinance under a home rule charter which [buy] buys and [sell] sells land for community development purposes.(7) [Tourist] Any tourist promotion [agencies] agency or [their] its local community-based nonprofit sponsor which [engage] engages in the acquisition of former industrial sites as part of an "Industrial Heritage" or similar program.(8) [Conservancies] Any conservancy engaged in the renewal or reclamation of an industrial site.(9) Any land bank established under 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 (relating to land banks).20250HB1713PN2110 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1713PN2110 - 3 - 12